Louisiana, session 2026, HB672.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part VI of Chapter 3 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:971 through 972, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART VI. BOLSTERING BRICK MANUFACTURING IN LOUISIANA ACT
§971. Findings; purpose
A. The legislature finds that brick manufacturing has been integral to this
state's economy since its earliest days, yet this state currently ranks thirty-third
nationally in clay brick production despite possessing substantial clay deposits,
favorable natural gas pricing, superior port and rail infrastructure, and an
experienced manufacturing workforce. The legislature declares that expanding this
industry would create quality manufacturing jobs, increase supply of and demand for
locally-sourced building materials, and position this state to capture a greater share
of regional and national markets.
B. It is the purpose of this Act to bolster the establishment of brick
manufacturing facilities in this state by reducing regulatory barriers, lowering entry
costs, and providing targeted support to qualifying enterprises, thereby enabling this
state to leverage its natural resources and infrastructure for the benefit of local
workers and this state's economic competitiveness.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 672 ENROLLED
§972. Brick manufacturing; definitions; priority industry; rail and port access
A. Louisiana Economic Development may support the recruitment, retention,
and expansion of brick manufacturing facilities in this state within existing statutory
authority and subject to the availability of funds.
B. In accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Louisiana
Economic Development may develop policies, guidance, or program criteria
consistent with existing economic development programs, when appropriate and
within existing authority, including but not limited to the following:
(1) Identifying sites that possess characteristics suitable for brick
manufacturing operations, such as proximity to clay deposits, for pre-certification.
(2) Establishing specialized workforce development and training initiatives
for brick manufacturing.
(3) Developing job creation and hiring initiatives for brick manufacturing
enterprises.
(4) Providing clear regulatory pathways for the establishment of brick
manufacturing facilities throughout this state.
(5) Coordinating with ports, rail providers, and local governments regarding
infrastructure needs associated with brick manufacturing projects.
(6) Other lawful economic development activities consistent with this Part
and existing programs.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.